Massachusetts, session 194th, S2153.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 15ZZZZZZ
the following section:-
Section 15AAAAAAA. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart
the fourth Thursday in March as Tuskegee Airmen Commemoration Day in recognition of the
service and sacrifice during World War II of the Black pilots, bombardiers, navigators, flight
surgeons, nurses, mechanics, instructors, crewmembers and all support personnel who changed
the course of history and recommending that the day be observed in an appropriate manner by
the people.
of 1